Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.073

General election.

"General election" means an election required to be held on a fixed date recurring at regular intervals.

[ 2003 c 111 s 113. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.01.070. Formerly RCW 29.01.070.]